Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1005
Dogfighting, cockfighting, bearbaiting, or pitting an animal against another; prohibited acts; penalty.

(1) No person shall knowingly:

(a) Promote, engage in, or be employed at dogfighting, cockfighting, bearbaiting, or pitting an animal against another;

(b) Receive money for the admission of another person to a place kept for such purpose;

(c) Own, use, train, sell, or possess an animal for such purpose; or

(d) Permit any act as described in this subsection to occur on any premises owned or controlled by him or her.

(2) Any person violating subsection (1) of this section shall be guilty of a Class IIIA felony and shall also be subject to section 28-1019.

(3) No person shall knowingly and willingly be present at and witness as a spectator dogfighting, cockfighting, bearbaiting, or the pitting of an animal against another as prohibited in subsection (1) of this section. Any person who violates any provision of this subsection shall be guilty of a Class IIIA felony and shall also be subject to section 28-1019.

Laws 1988, LB 170, § 3;

Laws 2003, LB 273, § 3;

Laws 2013, LB329, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB605, § 48.